Hawaii statutes.
§663-4 Actions which survive death of
wrongdoer or other person liable. All rights of action arising out of
physical injury to the person or out of the death of a person as provided by
section 663-3, shall survive, notwithstanding the death of the wrongdoer or any
other persons who may be liable for damages for such physical injury or death.
[L 1953, c 206, pt of §1; am L 1955, c 205, pt of §3; RL 1955, §246-3; HRS
§663-4]

Cross References

Abatement and revival, see chapter 634, pt V.

Probate, claims, see chapter 560.

Rules of Court

Substitution of parties, see HRCP rule 25.

Case Notes

Does not provide for survival of defamation actions. 1 H.
App. 517, 620 P.2d 771 (1980).

Judgments for punitive damages may be entered against the
estate of a deceased tortfeasor. 104 H. 241 (App.), 87 P.3d 910 (2003).

Cited: 45 H. 373, 383, 369 P.2d 96 (1961).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next